Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 17.8. Automatic Renewal Offers and Continuous Service Offers.

§ 59.1-207.45.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Automatic renewal” means a plan or arrangement in which a paid subscription or purchasing agreement is automatically renewed at the end of a definite term for a subsequent term.

“Automatic renewal offer terms” means the following clear and conspicuous disclosures:

That the subscription or purchasing agreement will continue until the consumer cancels;

The description of the cancellation policy that applies to the offer;

The recurring charges that will be charged to the consumer’s credit or debit card or payment account with a third party as part of the automatic renewal plan or arrangement and that the amount of the charge may change, if that is the case, and the amount
to which the charge will change, if known;

The length of the automatic renewal term or that the service is continuous, unless the length of the term is chosen by the consumer; and

The minimum purchase obligation, if any.

“Clear and conspicuous” or

“clearly and conspicuously”
means in larger type than the surrounding text, or in contrasting type, font, or color to the surrounding text of the same size, or set off from the surrounding text of the same size by symbols or other marks,
in a manner that clearly calls attention to the language. In the case of an audio disclosure, “clear and conspicuous” or “clearly and conspicuously” means in a volume and cadence sufficient to be readily audible and understandable.

“Consumer” means any individual who seeks or acquires, by purchase or lease, any goods, services, money, or credit for personal, family, or household purposes.

“Continuous service” means a plan or arrangement in which a subscription or purchasing agreement continues until the consumer cancels the service.

“Supplier” has the same meaning ascribed thereto in § 59.1-198.

History.
2018, c. 704.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, c. 704, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.”

§ 59.1-207.46.
Making automatic renewal or continuous service offer to consumer; affirmative consent required; disclosures; prohibited conduct.

No supplier making an automatic renewal or continuous service offer to a consumer in the Commonwealth shall do any of the following:

Fail to present the automatic renewal offer terms or continuous service offer terms in a clear and conspicuous manner before the consumer becomes obligated on the automatic renewal or continuous service offer and in visual proximity, or in the case of
an offer conveyed by voice, in temporal proximity, to the request for consent to the offer.

Charge the consumer’s credit or debit card or the consumer’s account with a third party for an automatic renewal or continuous service without first obtaining the consumer’s affirmative consent to the agreement containing the automatic renewal offer terms
or continuous service offer terms.

Fail to provide an acknowledgment that includes the automatic renewal or continuous service offer terms, cancellation policy, and information regarding how to cancel in a manner that is capable of being retained by the consumer. If the offer includes
a free trial, the supplier shall also disclose in the acknowledgment how to cancel the free trial before the consumer pays or becomes obligated to pay for the goods or services.

A supplier making automatic renewal or continuous service offers shall provide a toll-free telephone number, an electronic mail address, a postal address only when the supplier directly bills the consumer, or another cost-effective, timely, and easy-to-use
mechanism for cancellation that shall be described in the acknowledgment specified in subdivision A 3. Each supplier making automatic renewal or continuous service offers through an online website shall make available a conspicuous
online option to cancel a recurring purchase of a good or service.

In the case of a material change in the terms of the automatic renewal or continuous service offer that has been accepted by a consumer in the Commonwealth, the supplier shall provide the consumer with a clear and conspicuous notice of the material change
and provide information regarding how to cancel in a manner that is capable of being retained by the consumer.

The requirements of this section shall apply only prior to the completion of the initial order for the automatic renewal or continuous service, except:

The requirement in subdivision A 3 may be fulfilled after completion of the initial order; and

The requirement in subsection C shall be fulfilled prior to implementation of the material change.

History.
2018, c. 704; 2022, c. 557.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, c. 704, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 557, substituted “cancel the free trial” for “cancel and allow the consumer to cancel” in subdivision A 3; and added the last sentence of subsection B.

§ 59.1-207.47.
When goods, wares, merchandise, or products deemed a gift.

In any case in which a supplier sends any goods, wares, merchandise, or products to a consumer under a continuous service agreement or automatic renewal of a purchase without first obtaining the consumer’s affirmative consent as described in § 59.1-207.46,
the goods, wares, merchandise, or products shall for all purposes be deemed an unconditional gift to the consumer, who may use or dispose of the same in any manner he sees fit without any obligation whatsoever on the consumer’s part
to the supplier, including any obligation or responsibility for shipping any goods, wares, merchandise, or products to the supplier.

History.
2018, c. 704.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, c. 704, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.”

§ 59.1-207.48.
Exemptions.

This chapter shall not apply to:

Any service provided by a supplier or its affiliate where either the supplier or its affiliate is doing business pursuant to a franchise issued by a political subdivision of the Commonwealth or a license, franchise, certificate, or other authorization
issued by the State Corporation Commission to a public service company or public utility pursuant to Title 56;

Any service provided by a supplier or its affiliate where either the supplier or its affiliate is regulated by the State Corporation Commission, the Federal Communications Commission, or the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission;

Alarm company operators that are regulated pursuant to §

15.2-911

;

A bank, bank holding company, or the subsidiary or affiliate of either, or a credit union or other financial institution, licensed under federal or state law;

Any home protection company regulated by the State Corporation Commission pursuant to Chapter 26 (§

38.2-2600

et seq.) of Title 38.2;

Any home service contract provider regulated by the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services pursuant to Chapter 33.1 (§ 59.1-434.1 et seq.); or

Any health club registered pursuant to the Virginia Health Club Act (59.1-294 et seq.).

History.
2018, c. 704.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, c. 704, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.”

§ 59.1-207.49.
Enforcement; penalties.

Any violation of this chapter shall constitute a prohibited practice under the provisions of § 59.1-200 and shall be subject to the enforcement provisions of the Virginia Consumer Protection Act (§ 59.1-196 et seq.). However, if a supplier makes a good
faith effort to comply with the requirements of this chapter, the supplier shall not be subject to either a civil penalty under § 59.1-206 or damages under § 59.1-204.

History.
2018, c. 704.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, c. 704, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.”